Washington statutes.
RCW 39.100.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Benefit zone" means the geographic zone from which taxes are to be appropriated to finance public improvements authorized under this chapter and in which a hospital that has received a certificate of need is to be constructed.

(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.

(3) "Local government" means any city, town, county, or any combination thereof.

(4) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative action by a local government.

(5) "Participating taxing authority" means a taxing authority that has entered into a written agreement with a local government for the use of hospital benefit zone financing to the extent of allocating excess local excise taxes to the local government for the purpose of financing all or a portion of the costs of designated public improvements.

(6) "Public improvements" means:

(a) Infrastructure improvements within the benefit zone that include:

(i) Street and road construction and maintenance;

(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;

(iii) Sidewalks and streetlights;

(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;

(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;

(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas; and

(vii) Stormwater and drainage management systems; and

(b) The construction, maintenance, and improvement of state highways that are connected to the benefit zone, including interchanges connected to the benefit zone.

(7) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of: (a) Design, planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site preparation including land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) demolishing, relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of public improvements; (c) relocating utilities as a result of public improvements; and (d) financing public improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs on indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any necessary reserves for indebtedness; and administrative expenses and feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these costs, including related costs that may have been incurred before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the public improvements and the use of hospital benefit zone financing to fund the costs of the public improvements.

(8) "Tax allocation revenues" means those tax revenues derived from the receipt of excess local excise taxes under RCW 39.100.050 and distributed by a local government, participating taxing authority, or both, to finance public improvements.

(9) "Taxing authority" means a governmental entity that imposes a sales or use tax under chapter 82.14 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within a proposed or approved benefit zone.

[ 2011 c 363 s 1; 2007 c 266 s 2; 2006 c 111 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—2007 c 266: "The legislature finds that local governments need flexible financing for public improvements that do not increase the combined state and local sales tax rate." [ 2007 c 266 s 1.]

Application—2007 c 266: "This act applies retroactively to July 1, 2006." [ 2007 c 266 s 10.]

Effective date—2007 c 266: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2007." [ 2007 c 266 s 11.]